el: Πρότυπο σήματος βίντεο: Αυτόματος; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Άλλο
sl-SI: Standard video signala: Samodejno; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Drugo
nl: Videosignaalstandaard: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Andere
vi: Tiêu chuẩn tín hiệu video: Tự động; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Khác
ko: 비디오 신호 표준: 자동; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; 기타
pl: Standard sygnału wideo: Automatyczna; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Inne
th: มาตรฐานสัญญาณวิดีโอ: อัตโนมัติ; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 影像信號標準: 自動; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; 其他
ro-RO: Standard semnal video: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Altele
sk-SK: Norma video signálu: Automatický; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Iné
cs: Standard video signálu: Automatický; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Jiné
ru: Стандарт видеосигнала: Авто; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Другой
lt-LT: Vaizdo signalo standartas: Automatinis; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Kita
tr: Video sinyal standardı: Otomatik; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Diğer
nb: Videosignalstandard: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Annet
fi: Videosignaalin standardi: Automaattinen; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Muu
hr-HR: Standard video signala: Automatski; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стандарт на видео сигнала: Авто; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Други
pt-PT: Padrão de sinal de vídeo: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Outro
pt-BR: Padrão de sinal de vídeo: Automático; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Outro
de: Videosignalstandard: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Sonstiges
da: Videosignalstandard: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Andet
hu: Videojelszabvány: Automatiku; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Egyéb
sv: Videosignalstandard: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Övrigt
it: Standard del segnale video: Automatica; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Altro
zh-CN: 视频信号标准: 自动; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; 其他
en: Video signal standard: Auto; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Other
es: Estándar de señal de video: Automático; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Otros
ja: ビデオ信号規格: 自動; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; その他
fr: Norme de signal vidéo: Automatique; NTSC; NTSC/PAL; NTSC/PAL/SECAM; PAL; SECAM; Autre